src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES !!≈ * **@CODE@** trisyllabic stems: geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll
+v1+A+Sem/Dummytag:keahtes LEXATTR ;
+v2+A+Sem/Dummytag:geahtes LEXATTR ;

LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum !!≈ * **@CODE@** trisyllabic stems: geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll
+v1+A+Sem/Hum+CmpN/PlG:keahtes LEXATTR ;
+v2+A+Sem/Hum+CmpN/PlG:geahtes LEXATTR ;


LEXICON GEAHTES !!≈ * **@CODE@**  geahtes for trisyll, heapmi for bisyll
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:#geahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:#keahtes K ;

LEXICON OVDDIT  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Inherently comparative adjectives, bisyll
 +Gram/Comp+Attr:%>b K ;
 +Gram/Comp:%>b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Use/NG:%>mužž BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON MADDELEABBO  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Inherently comparative adjectives, trisyll
 +Gram/Comp+Dial/-GG:at SHORTCOMP_PRED_MINIP ; !
 +Gram/Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_MINIP ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Gram/Comp+Dial/-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_PRED_MINIP ;
 +Gram/Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_MINIP ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Gram/Comp+Err/Orth+v1:eabbu EABBU_ERRforms ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard.
 +Gram/Comp+Dial/-KJ+v1:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.
 +Gram/Comp+Dial/-GG+v2:abºbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.
 +Gram/Comp+Err/Orth:ebºbo EABBU_ERRforms ;
 +Gram/Comp+Err/Orth+v2:abºbu EABBU_ERRforms ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard.
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-GG:amos EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:epmos EAMOS_ERRforms ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:eamºmos EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:eapmus EAMOS_ERRforms ;


!! # Nominal derivation
! ------------------

!! ## Noun derivation
! - - - - - - - -


LEXICON VUOHTA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgG
 +Der3+Der/vuota+N+CmpN/SgG:#vuohºta VUOHTAMORPH ;
 +Der3+Der/vuota+N+CmpN/SgG+Err/Orth:#vuoda%> GOAHTI-OBL ;


LEXICON VUOHTAMORPH !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@C.NeedNoun@ VUOHTAMORPHcase ;

LEXICON VUOHTAMORPHcase
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>   R         ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>W3 R         ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>X7 flagON-R  ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>   flagOFF-R ;
          +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 R         ;

 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;

! NomV                 ;
 +Sg+Nom: K          ;
!+Sg+Nom:%> NPx3V      ;
        :%> EssV       ;
        :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
!       :%> GOAHTE-    ; replaced bŧ individual pointers:





!! # Adjective derivation
! - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON LAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** from verbs: čirrolas, bealkálas etc
 :%> ATTR ;  ! To capture the attributive forms before going to N lexica.
!+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ; lik attr-form
 MUSH ;


LEXICON BUOREMUSS !!≈ * **@CODE@** superlatives, from bisyll adjectives
 : BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON BUOREMUS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Attr: K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
! JOHTOLAT0 ; !replaced to avoid compound
! VUOHTA ;
 :a%> BUOREMUSSA- ;

LEXICON BUOREMUSSA- !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:X8t K ;
 +Sg+Nom: NPxVvowch ;
 +Ess:n%> NPxC ;
 EABBUCASE2 ;




LEXICON HEAPMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** caritives
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:X7 K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: NPxVvowch ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:X8t K ;

LEXICON LAGAN !!≈ * **@CODE@** lágan, lágán and subform lagan as well
+v2:lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+v1:lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+Err/Orth-a-á:lagan LAGAN_LAGAS ;

LEXICON LAGAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** lágaš, lágáš and subform lagaš as well
+v2:lágáž LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+v1:lágaž LAGAN_LAGAS ;
+Err/Orth-a-á:lagaž LAGAN_LAGAS ;


LEXICON LAGAN_LAGAS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                     +Attr:           K           ;
!                           :%>         EABBO/EAMOS ; !no comp.
                   +Sg+Nom:           K           ;
                 +Use/-PLX:           VUOHTA      ;
                      +Ess:%>in       K           ;
                   +Sg+Nom:00%>       NPxC        ;
                   +Sg+Gen:%>a        K           ;
  +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:           K           ;
                +Cmp/SgGen:%>a        R           ;
                   +Sg+Gen:%>         NPxC        ;
                   +Sg+Acc:%>a        K           ;
  +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:           K           ;
                   +Sg+Acc:%>         NPxC        ;
                   +Pl+Nom:%>at       K           ;
                   +Sg+Ill:%>asa%>    NPxVvowch   ;
          +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ijddá%>  NPx1V       ;
                   +Sg+Ill:%>ij       K           ;
                   +Sg+Loc:%>is       K           ;
    +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in       K           ; ! !SOUTH
                   +Sg+Com:%>ijn      K           ;
          +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnna    K           ;
                   +Pl+Gen:%>ijd      K           ;
                +Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd      R           ;
                   +Pl+Acc:%>ijd      K           ;
                   +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda    K           ;
                   +Pl+Loc:%>ijn      K           ;
          +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna    K           ;
    +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs      K           ; ! !SOUTH
                   +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn   K           ;
                +Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑-     ENDLEX      ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                   +Sg+Loc:%>istti%>  NPxVvowch   ;
                   +Sg+Com:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch   ;
!                  +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch   ; !^P^
                   +Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch   ;
                   +Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch   ;
                   +Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC        ;
                   +Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch   ;
                   +Pl+Com:%>ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1  ;
     +Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-#      ProperNoun  ; ! Definitely circular x 35000.


LEXICON AHKASAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** derived words on -saš, -haš, -laš, no comp
 +Attr:aš K ;
 +Sg+Nom:aš K ;
 +Sg+Nom:ažža%> NPxVvowch ; !
 +Cmp/Attr:aš%> R ;
 +Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +Ess:ažža%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:ažža%>t K ;
 +Use/-PLX:aš VUOHTA ;
 :ažža%> HEAPMIOBL ;
! :ažž DEARVVASLAS ; !not here since these have no comp. forms

LEXICON AHKASAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@**  derived words on -saš, -haš, -laš, only plural,
 +Attr:aš K ;
 +Cmp/Attr:aš%> R ;
 +Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:ažža%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Use/-PLX:aš VUOHTA ;
 :ažža%> HEAPMIOBL ;

LEXICON IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS	!
 :ihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ihkkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ikal ETNOLOGALAS ;

LEXICON IIVVAL-ETNOLOGALAS	!
 :ijvval ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ijval ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ivval ETNOLOGALAS ;



LEXICON UVRRAL-ETNOLOGALAS	!
 :uvrral ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:uvral ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:url ETNOLOGALAS ;



LEXICON ETNOLOGALAS	!like AHKASAS but with adverbs
AHKASAS ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ačča%>t K ;


LEXICON RIEVTTALAS	!gives both rievttálaš and rievttalaš
+v1:rievttál ETNOLOGALAS ;
+v2:rievttal ETNOLOGALAS ;




LEXICON SISKKALDAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** olgguldas, siskkáldas, siskkildas, nuppáldas, that's all
 +Attr:as K ;
 +Sg+Nom:as K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:assa%> NPxVvowch ; ! ! tentative.
 +Cmp/Attr:as%> R ;
 +Ess:assa%>n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:assa%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Use/-PLX:as VUOHTA ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:asa%>t K ;
 :assa%> EABBUCASE2 ;	!not to LASJOBL



LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1 !!≈ * **@CODE@** caritives and their derivatives (huvva, huhtti), from bisyll nouns
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»W4hin K ;		!
 +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4his%> ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva:»W4 UVVA_IV ;
 +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»W4huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/laakan+A+Use/-Spell:» LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
                                                      ! Nielsen: beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
 +Der1+Der2+Der/laagasj+A+Use/-Spell:» LAGAS ; ! ! etc.
