src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
bargorievttálaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:bargo# RIEVTTALAS ;
geavatkeahtes+Err/Orth:geava LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
dearvvašvuođapolitihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:dearvvašvuođa#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
duogimus+A+Sem/Plc+Gram/Superl:duogimuss BUOREMUSS ;
dánsullasaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:dán#sullas AHKASAS ;
ealáhuskultuvrralaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ealáhus#kult UVRRAL-ETNOLOGALAS;
eanadoalloekonomalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:eana#doallo#ekonomal ETNOLOGALAS ;
ekstensiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ekstens IIVVAL-ETNOLOGALAS ;
elektrihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:elektr IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
gahperkeahtes:gahper LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum ;
dáhtokeahtes:dáhto LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum ;
dáhtukeahtes:dáhtu LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum ;
rájáheapme+Err/Orth:rájá LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum ;
gaskaleabbo+A+Sem/Dummytag:gaskal MADDELEABBO ;
gaskkamus+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Superl:gaskkamuss BUOREMUS ;
gaskkamuš+A+Sem/Plc+Gram/Superl+Err/Orth:gaskkamušša%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
guhkki+A+Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:guhkkimuss BUOREMUSS ;
oskuigullevaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:oskui#gullev AHKASAS ;
iešguđetahkásaččat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ieš#guđet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežametahkásaččat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:iežamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
interkultuvrralaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:inter#kult UVRRAL-ETNOLOGALAS;
jeagelkeahtes:jeagel LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
jiehčametahkásaččat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jiehčamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežadetahkásaččat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jiežadet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jurddalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:jurddal ETNOLOGALAS ;
klinihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:klin IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
kommunikatiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:kommunikat IIVVAL-ETNOLOGALAS ;
lagat+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Comp:laga OVDDIT ;
maŋit+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Plc:máŋi OVDDIT ;
muhtosaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:muhtos AHKASAS ;
máddeleabbo+A+Sem/Dummytag:máddel MADDELEABBO ;
máttaviestareabbo+A+Sem/Dummytag:mátta#viestar MADDELEABBO ;
njálgaseabbo+A+Sem/Dummytag:njálgas MADDELEABBO ;
nuppáldas+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuppáld SISKKALDAS ;
operatiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:operat IIVVAL-ETNOLOGALAS ;
ovddet+A+Sem/Plc:ovdde OVDDIT ;
ovddimus+A+Sem/Plc+Gram/Superl:ovddimuss BUOREMUSS ;
pedagogalaš+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:pedagogál ETNOLOGALAS ;
priváhtarievttálaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:priváhta# RIEVTTALAS ;
rievdatkeahtes:rievdat LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
riikkapolitihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:riikka#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
guđasiidosaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:guđa#siidos AHKASAS ;
siskkildas+A+Sem/Dummytag:siskkild SISKKALDAS ;
siskkáldas+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:siskkald SISKKALDAS ;
sisrievttálaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:sis# RIEVTTALAS ;
sosiokultuvrralaš+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:sosio-kult UVRRAL-ETNOLOGALAS;
struktuvrralaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:strukt UVRRAL-ETNOLOGALAS;
summatiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:summat IIVVAL-ETNOLOGALAS ;
sátnesiskkáldas+A+Sem/Dummytag:sátne#siskkáld SISKKALDAS ;
sávakeahtes:sáva LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
vearámus+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Superl:vearámuss BUOREMUS ;
viestareabbo+A+Sem/Dummytag:viestar MADDELEABBO ;
vuolit+A+Sem/Plc:vuoli OVDDIT ;
dáppit+A+Sem/Plc:dáppi OVDDIT ;
vuosttamuš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Superl:vuosttamužž BUOREMUSS ;
namaheapme+Err/Orth:nama LEXATTR_GEAHTES_Hum ;
áigeguovdil+A+Sem/Dummytag+Der2+Der/Superl+A+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččamuss BUOREMUS ;
álbmotrievttálaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:álbmot# RIEVTTALAS ;
báberkeahtes:báber LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
mikroskohpalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:mikro^skohpal ETNOLOGALAS ;
buotlágan+A+MWE+Err/SpaceCmp+Sem/Dummytag:buot% lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
dinlágan+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:din# LAGAN ;
duokkárgelágaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duokkárge# LAGAS ;
earálágan+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:eara#lagan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
earálágan+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:eara#lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
gámavuođulágan+A+Sem/Dummytag:gáma#vuođu# LAGAN ;
iehčamelágaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:iehčame# LAGAS ;
láirelágan+A+Sem/Substnc:láire# LAGAN ;
muhtunlágaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:muhtun# LAGAS ;
ruoššalágan+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ruošša# LAGAN ;
seammalágan+A+Use/NG+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:seammá#lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
sirátlágaš+A+Sem/Food:sirát# LAGAS ;
